Illinois, session 104th, HB3103.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Department of Commerce and Economic 5Opportunity Law of the Civil Administrative Code of Illinois 6is amended by changing Section 605-705 as follows: 7    (20 ILCS 605/605-705)  (was 20 ILCS 605/46.6a)8    Sec. 605-705. Grants to local tourism and convention 9bureaus. 10    (a) To establish a grant program for local tourism and 11convention bureaus. The Department will develop and implement 12a program for the use of funds, as authorized under this Act, 13by local tourism and convention bureaus. Each bureau receiving 14funds under this Act will be certified by the Department as the 15designated recipient to serve an area of the State. For the 16purposes of this Act, bureaus eligible to receive funds are 17those local tourism and convention bureaus that are (i) either 18units of local government or incorporated as not-for-profit 19organizations; (ii) in legal existence for a minimum of 2 20years before July 1, 2001; (iii) operating with a paid, 21full-time staff whose sole purpose is to promote tourism in 22the designated service area; and (iv) affiliated with one or 23more municipalities or counties that support the bureau with   HB3103- 2 -LRB104 11452 HLH 21540 b1local hotel-motel taxes. After July 1, 2001, bureaus 2requesting certification in order to receive funds for the 3first time must be local tourism and convention bureaus that 4are (i) either units of local government or incorporated as 5not-for-profit organizations; (ii) in legal existence for a 6minimum of 2 years before the request for certification; (iii) 7operating with a paid, full-time staff whose sole purpose is 8to promote tourism in the designated service area; and (iv) 9affiliated with multiple municipalities or counties that 10support the bureau with local hotel-motel taxes. In addition, 11on and after July 1, 2025, a local tourism and convention 12bureau may not be certified to receive funds under this Act if 13all or part of the geographic area served by the local tourism 14and convention bureau is represented by another tourism and 15convention bureau that is certified by the Department under 16this Section. Each bureau receiving funds under this Act will 17be certified by the Department as the designated recipient to 18serve an area of the State. Notwithstanding the criteria set 19forth in this subsection (a), or any rule adopted under this 20subsection (a), the Director of the Department may provide for 21the award of grant funds to one or more entities if in the 22Department's judgment that action is necessary in order to 23prevent a loss of funding critical to promoting tourism in a 24designated geographic area of the State.25    (b) To distribute grants to local tourism and convention 26bureaus from appropriations made from the Local Tourism Fund   HB3103- 3 -LRB104 11452 HLH 21540 b1for that purpose. Of the amounts appropriated annually to the 2Department for expenditure under this Section prior to July 1, 32011, one-third of those monies shall be used for grants to 4convention and tourism bureaus in cities with a population 5greater than 500,000. The remaining two-thirds of the annual 6appropriation prior to July 1, 2011 shall be used for grants to 7convention and tourism bureaus in the remainder of the State, 8in accordance with a formula based upon the population served. 9Of the amounts appropriated annually to the Department for 10expenditure under this Section beginning July 1, 2011, 18% of 11such moneys shall be used for grants to convention and tourism 12bureaus in cities with a population greater than 500,000. Of 13the amounts appropriated annually to the Department for 14expenditure under this Section beginning July 1, 2011, 82% of 15such moneys shall be used for grants to convention bureaus in 16the remainder of the State, in accordance with a formula based 17upon the population served. The Department may reserve up to 183% of total local tourism funds available for costs of 19administering the program to conduct audits of grants, to 20provide incentive funds to those bureaus that will conduct 21promotional activities designed to further the Department's 22statewide advertising campaign, to fund special statewide 23promotional activities, and to fund promotional activities 24that support an increased use of the State's parks or historic 25sites. The Department shall require that any convention and 26tourism bureau receiving a grant under this Section that   HB3103- 4 -LRB104 11452 HLH 21540 b1requires matching funds shall provide matching funds equal to 2no less than 50% of the grant amount, except that: (1) in 3Fiscal Years 2021 through 2024 only, the Department shall 4require that any convention and tourism bureau receiving a 5grant under this Section that requires matching funds shall 6provide matching funds equal to no less than 25% of the grant 7amount; (2) in Fiscal Year 2025, the Department shall require 8that any convention and tourism bureau receiving a grant under 9this Section that requires matching funds shall provide 10matching funds equal to no less than 30% of the grant amount; 11and (3) in Fiscal Year 2026, the Department shall require that 12any convention and tourism bureau receiving a grant under this 13Section that requires matching funds shall provide matching 14funds equal to no less than 40% of the grant amount. During 15fiscal year 2013, the Department shall reserve $2,000,000 of 16the available local tourism funds for appropriation to the 17Historic Preservation Agency for the operation of the Abraham 18Lincoln Presidential Library and Museum and State historic 19sites. 20    To provide for the expeditious and timely implementation 21of the changes made by Public Act 101-636, emergency rules to 22implement the changes made by Public Act 101-636 may be 23adopted by the Department subject to the provisions of Section 245-45 of the Illinois Administrative Procedure Act. 25(Source: P.A. 102-16, eff. 6-17-21; 102-699, eff. 4-19-22; 26103-8, eff. 6-7-23; 103-588, eff. 6-5-24.)   HB3103- 5 -LRB104 11452 HLH 21540 b1    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 2becoming law.